Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
PART 15 Conversions, Mergers, and Consolidations Involving National Banks

Cross references.

Requirement that department approve change in control of financial institutions generally, §

7-1-231

.

7-1-550.
Authority for national bank or federal savings bank conversions; requirements.

Subject to this part and any applicable branching law or regulation, a national bank may convert to a bank or trust company upon:

Compliance with the applicable laws of the United States, including any provisions thereof relating to approval of said conversion by the shareholders and directors of the national bank and to dissenting rights of shareholders in such national bank, and compliance with any other requirements prescribed by the department to protect the shareholders or members or the safety and soundness of the institution;

Reserved;

Approval of the conversion by the department as provided in this part; and

Issuance of the appropriate certificate by the Secretary of State as provided in this part.

Reserved.

A federal savings bank may apply to the department to convert to a state charter. The provisions of Code Section 7-1-293 shall apply to the resulting bank, and the conversion procedure shall be the same as for national bank conversions.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 73, §§ 3, 4; Code 1933, § 41A-2501, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 7; Ga. L. 1996, p. 848, § 9; Ga. L. 1997, p. 485, § 18; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 13; Ga. L. 2005, p. 826, § 10/SB 82; Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 12/HB 111.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in subsection (a), substituted “a national bank may convert to a bank or trust” for “a national bank located in this state may convert into, merge or consolidate with, a bank or trust” at the end of subsection (a); deleted “, merger, or consolidation” following “approval of said conversion” in paragraph (a)(1); substituted “Reserved;” for the former provisions of paragraph (a)(2), which read: “Adoption of any plan of merger or consolidation by the directors and shareholders of any party thereto existing under the laws of this state as required by paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 7-1-531;”; deleted “, merger, or consolidation” following “Approval of the conversion” in paragraph (a)(3); substituted “Reserved.” for the former provisions of subsection (b), which read: “A conversion, merger, or consolidation across state lines of any one or more national banks with a bank or trust company shall also be subject to the provisions of Part 20 of this article.”; and deleted “located in this state” following “A federal savings bank” in the first sentence of subsection (c).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, “article” was substituted for “chapter” in subsection (b).

7-1-551.
National bank to state bank or trust company conversions — Articles of conversion.

The party or parties desiring to consummate a conversion authorized by Code Section 7-1-550 shall, upon requisite approval of the plan by their directors and shareholders, file with the department articles of conversion together with the fee required by Code Section 7-1-862.

The articles of conversion shall be signed by two duly authorized officers of the national bank under its seal and shall contain:

Its name and the name of the resulting bank or trust company;

The street address and county of its main office;

The name and initial registered agent and the street address where the initial registered office will be located;

The votes by which the plan of conversion was adopted and the time, place, and notice of each meeting in connection with such adoption;

The name and county of residence of each director of the resulting bank or trust company;

The provisions required in articles of a new bank or trust company by paragraphs (5), (6), (7), and (10) of subsection (a) of Code Section 7-1-392; and

The plan of conversion.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 73, §§ 5, 6; Code 1933, § 41A-2502, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1257, § 16; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 7; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 14; Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 13/HB 184; Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 13/HB 111.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in subsection (a), deleted “, merger, or consolidation” and “, merger, or consolidation,” following “conversion” twice; and, substituted “The name and county of residence of each director” for “The names and addresses of the first directors” at the beginning of paragraph (b)(5); and deleted former subsection (c), which read: “The articles of merger or consolidation shall be in the form specified by subsection (b) of Code Section 7-1-532.”

7-1-552.
National bank to state bank or trust company conversions — Filings with department.

In the case of a conversion, the national bank shall file with the department:

Information desired by the department in order to evaluate the proposed conversion, in the form specified by the department;

Applicable fees established by regulation of the department to defray the expenses of its investigation under Code Section 7-1-553; and

A certificate of the Secretary of State showing that the proposed name of the resulting bank or trust company has been reserved under Code Section 7-1-131.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 73, § 9; Code 1933, § 41A-2503, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 673, § 22; Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 14/HB 111.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, deleted former subsection (a), which read: “(a) In the case of a merger or consolidation, the parties shall make the filings and publication required by Code Sections 7-1-532 and 7-1-533.”; deleted the subsection (b) designation; deleted “also” following “the national bank shall” in the introductory paragraph; and deleted former subsection (c), which read: “(c) In the case of a conversion, the national bank shall publish, in the manner prescribed by Code Section 7-1-532, a notice of the proposed conversion, setting forth its name and the name it proposes to use as a bank or trust company and designating the place where a copy of the plan of conversion may be examined. The notice shall be published in the county of the main office of the national bank.”

7-1-553.
National bank to state bank or trust company conversions — Approval or disapproval by department; federal approval or disapproval.

In the case of a conversion, the department shall conduct such investigation as it may deem necessary to ascertain whether:

The articles of conversion and supporting items satisfy the requirements of this chapter;

The plan adequately protects the interests of depositors, other than creditors and shareholders; and

The requirements for a conversion under all applicable laws have been satisfied and the resulting institution would satisfy the requirements of this chapter applicable to it.

Within 90 days after receipt of the articles and the filings required by Code Section 7-1-552, the department shall, in its discretion, approve or disapprove the articles on the basis of its investigation and the criteria set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section. If the department shall approve the articles, it shall deliver its written approval with a copy of the articles attached to the Secretary of State and notify the national bank, and any other parties to the plan, of its action, provided that, if approval of any federal agency is required, the department may elect to not act on the application until such federal approval is given. If the department shall disapprove, at its option, the application, it shall give written notice to the national bank and any other parties to the plan of its disapproval and a statement to them generally of the reasons for its decision. The decision of the department shall be conclusive, except that it may be subject to judicial review under Code Section 7-1-90.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-2504, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 730, § 8; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1257, § 17; Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 15/HB 111.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, rewrote subsection (a), which read: “The department shall conduct such investigation as it may deem necessary to ascertain whether:

“(1) In the case of a conversion:

“(A) The articles of conversion and supporting items satisfy the requirements of this chapter;

“(B) The plan adequately protects the interests of depositors, other than creditors and shareholders; and

“(C) The requirements for a conversion under all applicable laws have been satisfied and the resulting institution would satisfy the requirements of this chapter applicable to it; and

“(2) In the case of a merger or consolidation, the criteria stated in subsection (a) of Code Section 7-1-534 are satisfied.”; and, in subsection (b), substituted “may elect to not act on the application” for “may withhold, at its option, its approval from the Secretary of State” near the end of the second sentence and deleted the former third sentence, which read: “If required federal approval is not given, the department may, at its option, withdraw its approval for this reason.”

7-1-554.
National bank to state bank or trust company conversions — Issuance of certificate of conversion.

If all the taxes, fees, and charges required by law shall have been paid and if the name of the resulting bank or trust company continues to be reserved or is available on the records of the Secretary of State, upon the receipt of the written approval of the department, the Secretary of State shall immediately issue to the resulting bank or trust company a certificate of conversion and shall retain a copy of such certificate, the articles, and the approval from the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 73, § 6; Ga. L. 1972, p. 727, § 6; Code 1933, § 41A-2505, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 16/HB 111.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, deleted “, consolidation, or merger” following “certificate of conversion” near the end.

7-1-555.
National bank to state bank or trust company conversions — Effect of issuance of certificate.

Issuance of a certificate of conversion shall have the following effect:

As of the issuance of the certificate of conversion by the Secretary of State, the conversion shall become effective;

The certificate of conversion shall be conclusive evidence of the performance of all conditions required by this chapter for conversion of a national bank to a state bank or trust company, except as against the state;

When a conversion becomes effective, the existence of the national bank shall continue in the resulting bank or trust company which shall have (except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection), without further act or deed, all the property, rights, powers, trusts, duties, and obligations of the national bank;

The articles of the resulting institution shall be the provisions stated in the articles of conversion;

The bank or trust company shall have the authority to engage only in such lines of business and activities and exercise only such powers or hold such assets as are then permissible upon original incorporation under this chapter and shall be subject to the same prohibitions and limitations as it would then be subject to upon original incorporation; provided, however, that if the converting institution owns or holds assets, engages in any business, or has powers that would not be allowed for a state bank, then the plan of conversion shall include a plan for holding or disposal of such nonconforming assets or the continuation or termination of such line of business, activity, or power. The department shall review the plan to determine whether, in the interest of safety and soundness and the other objectives of Code Section 7-1-3, the activity, power, asset, or line of business should be approved, denied, or phased out within a reasonable period of time, to be determined by the department; and

No liability of the national bank or of its shareholders, directors, or officers shall be affected, nor shall any lien on any property of the national bank be impaired, by the conversion. Any claim existing or action pending by or against the national bank may be prosecuted to judgment as if the conversion had not taken place, or the resulting bank or trust company may be substituted in its place.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 73, §§ 7, 12; Code 1933, § 41A-2506, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 795, § 25; Ga. L. 2000, p. 174, § 12; Ga. L. 2001, p. 970, § 7; Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 17/HB 111.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, deleted former subsection (a), which read: “Issuance of a certificate of merger or consolidation shall have the same effect stated in Code Section 7-1-536.”; deleted the former subsection (b) designation; and substituted “national bank to a state bank” for “national bank into a state bank” in paragraph (2).

7-1-556.
State bank or trust company to national bank or federal savings institution conversions.

A bank or trust company may convert to a national bank or a federal savings institution upon:

Authorization by and compliance with the laws of the United States; and

Adoption of a plan of conversion by the affirmative vote of at least:

A majority of its directors; and

The holders of two-thirds of each class of its shares at a meeting held upon not less than ten days’ notice to all shareholders.

A state bank or trust company which converts to a national bank or a federal savings institution shall:

Notify the department of the proposed conversion;

Provide such evidence of the adoption of the plan of conversion as the department may request;

Notify the department of any abandonment or disapproval of the plan; and

File with the department and with the Secretary of State a certificate of the approval of the conversion by the appropriate federal regulator.

Conversion of a state institution to a national banking association or a federal savings institution shall be effective upon completion of the requirements in subsection (b) of this Code section. Upon receipt of written confirmation from the department that the requirements of subsection (b) of this Code section have been satisfied, the institution’s articles as an institution existing under the laws of this state shall be automatically terminated.

History.

Code 1933, §§ 13-1305, 13-1306, 13-1307, 13-1308, 13-1309, enacted by Ga. L. 1949, p. 536, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 67, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-2507, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 15; Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 18/HB 111.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted “convert to a national bank” for “convert into, or merge or consolidate with, a national bank” in subsection (a); deleted “, merger, or consolidation” following “plan of conversion” in paragraph (a)(2); in subsection (b), substituted “converts to a national bank” for “converts into or merges or consolidates with a national bank” in the introductory paragraph; deleted “, merger, or consolidation” following “conversion” in paragraphs (b)(1), (b)(2), and (b)(4); and, in subsection (c), substituted “Conversion of a state institution to a national banking” for “Conversion, merger, or consolidation of a state institution into a national banking” at the beginning of the first sentence, and substituted “Code section. Upon receipt of written confirmation from the department that the requirements of subsection (b) of this Code section have been satisfied, the institution’s articles” for “Code section, and its articles” near the middle of the former first sentence.

7-1-557.
[Repealed] Merger, consolidation, or share exchange of nonbank corporations into national banks.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2007, p. 502, § 12/SB 70; repealed by Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 19/HB 111, effective July 1, 2021.